New Mexico, session 2026, SB155.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. [NEW MATERIAL] STATE AGENCY USE OF PROPER NAMES--REAL PROPERTY RESTORED TO ISRAEL FOLLOWING THE 1967 SIX-DAY WAR.-- A. Except as provided in Paragraph (1) of Subsection B of this section: (1) in written or printed official government material, a state agency shall use the terms "Judea and Samaria", "Judea" or "Samaria" to refer to real property adjacent to the Hashemite Kingdom of Jordan that was restored to Israel following the 1967 six-day war; and (2) in written or printed official government material, a state agency shall not use the term "West Bank" to refer to refer to real property adjacent to the Hashemite Kingdom of Jordan that was restored to Israel following the 1967 six-day war. B. As used in this section: (1) "official government material" means an administrative rule, a briefing, a communication, a guidance, material, a press release or a work product document prepared by a state agency, but does not mean teaching or research materials used or produced by post-secondary instructors employed by a state agency; and (2) "state agency" means the state government, including any department, division, institution, board, bureau, commission or committee of New Mexico and any employee or officer thereof. - 2 -